Massachusetts, session 194th, H934.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 131 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 2D. There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a 
separate, non-budgeted special revenue fund to be known as the MassWildlife Inland Fisheries 
and Wildlife Mitigation and Enhancement Fund, which shall be administered by the director of 
the division of fisheries and wildlife. There shall be credited into the fund revenues or other 
financing sources directed to the fund by appropriation or other monies authorized by the general 
court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund, monies received on account of 
certifications, permits, licenses, authorizations, approvals, judgments, and agreements to address 
adverse impacts to inland fish and wildlife resources, any income derived from the investment of 
amounts credited to the fund and monies from the repayment of loans from the fund, funds from 
public or private sources including, but not limited to, gifts, federal, state, or private grants, 

of 4 13 donations, rebates and settlements received by the commonwealth that are specifically 
designated to be credited to the fund and all other amounts credited or transferred into the fund 
from any other source. The amounts credited to the fund shall be expended, without further 
appropriation, for the purposes of protecting, mitigating damages to, studying and enhancing 
inland fish and wildlife resources, in accordance with the terms of the certifications, permits, 
licenses, authorizations, approvals, judgments, or agreements for which such amounts were 
received. 
Any unexpended balance in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund 
and available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years and shall not revert to the general fund. 
The state treasurer shall not deposit or transfer any amounts credited to the fund to the General 
Fund or to any other fund other than the MassWildlife Inland Fisheries and Wildlife Mitigation 
and Enhancement Fund. The director of the division of fisheries and wildlife shall not make 
expenditures from this fund or take any other action so as to cause the fund to be deficient at any 
point during the fiscal year. The state treasurer shall receive and deposit all revenues transmitted 
to the state treasurer under the provisions of this section in such manner that will ensure the 
highest rate of interest available consistent with the safety of the fund, and in an account from 
which amounts may be withdrawn at any time without penalty for such withdrawal, all interest 
accrued shall be deposited into the fund. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 131A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 8. There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a 
separate, non-budgeted special revenue fund to be known as the Natural Heritage Mitigation 

of 4 35 Fund, which shall be administered by the director of the division of fisheries and wildlife acting 
through the natural heritage and endangered species program. There shall be credited into the 
fund revenues or other financing sources directed to the fund by appropriation or other monies 
authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund, monies 
required by the conditions of conservation and management permits issued pursuant to chapter 
131A, monies received on account of certifications, permits, licenses, authorizations, approvals, 
judgments, and agreements to address unavoidable adverse impacts to a species, any income 
derived from the investment of amounts credited to the fund and monies from the repayment of 
loans from the fund, funds from public or private sources including, but not limited to, gifts, 
federal, state, or private grants, donations, rebates and settlements received by the 
commonwealth that are specifically designated to be credited to the fund and all other amounts 
credited or transferred into the fund from any other source. The amounts credited to the fund 
shall be expended, without further appropriation, for the purposes of mitigating adverse impacts 
to endangered, threatened, and special concern species, including but not limited to, habitat 
management, research and the protection of land, and in accordance with the terms of the 
certifications, permits, licenses, authorizations, approvals, judgments, or agreements for which 
such amounts were received. 
Any unexpended balance in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund 
and available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years and shall not revert to the general fund. 
The state treasurer shall not deposit or transfer any amounts credited to the fund to the general 
fund or to any other fund other than the Natural Heritage Mitigation Fund. The director of the 
division of fisheries and wildlife shall not make expenditures from this fund or take any other 
action so as to cause the fund to be deficient at any point during the fiscal year, nor shall these 

of 4 58 funds be used for operating the natural heritage endangered species program. The state treasurer 
shall receive and deposit all revenues transmitted to the state treasurer under the provisions of 
this section in such manner that will ensure the highest rate of interest available consistent with 
the safety of the fund, and in an account from which amounts may be withdrawn at any time 
without penalty for such withdrawal, all interest accrued shall be deposited into the fund. In the 
event that the fund established by this section is dissolved, all funds then remaining shall be 
deposited into the Natural Heritage and Endangered Species Fund established pursuant to section 
35D of chapter 10, to be used for the purposes described in this section.